South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Blood Cancer Awareness Month SECTION 1.    Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-320.    The month of September of each year is designated as "Blood Cancer Awareness Month." Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________